Louisiana, session 2026, HB577.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1892(B)(1)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1892. Payment and adjustment of claims; policies other than life and health and
accident; good faith duty; breach of good faith duty; vehicle damage claims;
extension of time to respond to claims during emergency or disaster;
penalties; arson-related claims suspension; definitions
* * *
B.(1)(a) Except as provided in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph, failure
to make payment within thirty days after receipt of satisfactory written proofs and
demand therefor or failure to make a written offer to settle any property damage
claim, including a third-party claim, within thirty days after receipt of satisfactory
proofs of loss of that claim, as provided in Paragraphs (A)(1) and (4) of this Section,
respectively, or failure to make the payment within thirty days after written
agreement or settlement when the failure is found to be arbitrary, capricious, or
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1299 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 577
without probable cause, shall subject the insurer to a penalty, in addition to the
amount of the loss, of up to fifty percent damages on the amount found to be due
from the insurer to the insured, plus any proven economic damages sustained as a
result of the breach, or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater, payable to the
insured, or in the event that a partial payment or tender has been made, of up to fifty
percent of the difference between the amount paid or tendered and the amount found
to be due, plus any proven economic damages sustained as a result of the breach, as
well as, in either instance, reasonable attorney fees and costs. The penalties, if
awarded, shall not be used by the insurer in computing either past or prospective loss
experience for the purpose of setting rates or making rate filings.
* * *